Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.76.650

Office to coordinate state participation within student exchange compact programs—Advice to governor, legislature.

The office shall periodically advise the governor and the legislature of the policy implications of the state of Washington's participation in the Western Interstate Commission for Higher Education student exchange programs as they affect long-range planning for post-secondary education, together with recommendations on the most efficient way to provide high cost or special educational programs to Washington residents.

[ 2011 1st sp.s. c 11 s 122; 1985 c 370 s 19; 1974 ex.s. c 4 s 5. Formerly RCW 28B.80.170.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2011 1st sp.s. c 11 ss 101-103, 106-202, 204-244, and 301: See note following RCW 28B.76.020.

Intent—2011 1st sp.s. c 11: See note following RCW 28B.76.020.

Severability—1974 ex.s. c 4: See note following RCW 28B.76.640.